Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 291.4 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Statewide Official Compensation
Commission.
B. The Statewide Official Compensation Commission shall consist
of the same persons who constitute the Board on Legislative
Compensation as provided by Section 21 of Article V of the Oklahoma
Constitution.

C. The Statewide Official Compensation Commission shall be
authorized to meet only on the same date as the Board on Legislative
Compensation.
D. The Statewide Official Compensation Commission shall set the
salary for each of the following elected officials:
1. The Governor;
2. The Lieutenant Governor;
3. The Attorney General;
4. The State Treasurer;
5. The State Auditor and Inspector;
6. The Superintendent of Public Instruction;
7. The State Insurance Commissioner;
8. The Commissioner of Labor; and
9. The members of the Oklahoma Corporation Commission.
E. The Statewide Official Compensation Commission shall not set
the salary for any of the officials identified in subsection D of
this section at an amount less than the salary in effect for such
officials as of January 1, 2025.
F. At its authorized meeting, the Statewide Official
Compensation Commission shall set the salary for each of the
officials identified in subsection D of this section for any term of
office for such officials beginning on or after the date as of which
the Commission sets the salary amount.
G. The Statewide Official Compensation Commission shall not
modify a salary amount in violation of the requirements of Section
10 of Article XXIII of the Oklahoma Constitution.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 250.4, is
amended to read as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 2674 Page 2

Section 250.4. A. Pursuant to provisions of the Constitution
of the State of Oklahoma from and after the beginning date of a term
of office which commences in, or after, January 2016, and except as
otherwise provided by this section, the following officers of the
State of Oklahoma shall be annually compensated for their services,
payable monthly, as follows:
1. The Governor shall receive a salary of One Hundred Forty-
seven Thousand Dollars ($147,000.00);
2. The Lieutenant Governor shall receive a salary of One
Hundred Fourteen Thousand Seven Hundred Thirteen Dollars
($114,713.00);
3. The Attorney General shall receive a salary of One Hundred
Thirty-two Thousand Eight Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($132,825.00);
4. The State Superintendent of Public Instruction shall receive
a salary of One Hundred Twenty-four Thousand Three Hundred Seventy-
three Dollars ($124,373.00);
5. Each member of the Corporation Commission shall receive a
salary of One Hundred Fourteen Thousand Seven Hundred Thirteen
Dollars ($114,713.00);
6. The State Treasurer shall receive a salary of One Hundred
Fourteen Thousand Seven Hundred Thirteen Dollars ($114,713.00);
7. The State Auditor and Inspector shall receive a salary of
One Hundred Fourteen Thousand Seven Hundred Thirteen Dollars
($114,713.00);
8. The State Insurance Commissioner shall receive a salary of
One Hundred Fourteen Thousand Seven Hundred Thirteen Dollars
($114,713.00); and
9. The Commissioner of Labor shall receive a salary of One
Hundred Five Thousand Fifty-three Dollars ($105,053.00).
B. With respect to any public official whose salary is provided
for by this section, the provisions of this section shall be
operative until the Statewide Official Compensation Commission
modifies the salary amount for such official. If the Statewide
Official Compensation Commission modifies the salary amount as
otherwise prescribed by this section, the order of the Commission
ENR. H. B. NO. 2674 Page 3

shall supersede the provisions of this section with respect to the
appliable statewide elected official.
SECTION 3. REPEALER 74 O.S. 2021, Section 250.4, as
amended by Section 2 of this act, is hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall become effective
November 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. Section 3 of this act shall become effective January
31, 2030.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2674 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2674 Page 5